bg-BG: Финиш/ефект на струните, постигнат чрез пръскане: Брокат; Гланц; Светещ в тъмното; Холограмен ефект; Мат; Металик; Многоцветен/смесен ефект; Неон; Перлен ефект; УВ реактивен (черна светлина); Друго
pt-PT: Acabamento/efeito do fio de spray: Purpurinas; Brilhante; Brilha no escuro; Holográfico; Mate; Metálico; Multicolor/efeito misto; Néon; Perolado; Reativo a UV (luz negra); Outro
sl-SI: Končni izgled/učinek nitk v razpršilu: Z bleščicami; Sijaj; Sveti v temi; Holografsko; Mat; Kovinsko; Večbarvno/mešan učinek; Neonsko; Biserno; UV-reaktivno (črna svetloba); Drugo
th: รูปแบบของสเปรย์หรือเอฟเฟกต์พื้นผิว: กลิตเตอร์; เงา; เรืองแสงในที่มืด; โฮโลแกรม; ด้าน; เมทัลลิก; หลากสี/เอฟเฟกต์ผสม; นีออน; ประกายมุก; ทำปฏิกิริยากับ UV (แบล็กไลต์); อื่นๆ
hu: Szerpentinspray felület/hatás: Csillámos; Fényes; Sötétben világító; Holografikus; Matt; Fémes; Többszínű/vegyes effekt; Neon; Gyöngyházfényű; UV-reaktív (fekete fény); Egyéb
lt-LT: Purškiamų siūlų efektas / apdaila: Blizgus; Žvilgantis; Šviečiantis tamsoje; Holografinis; Matinis; Metalizuotas; Daugiaspalvis / mišrus efektas; Neoninis; Perlamutrinis; Reaguojantis į UV spindulius; Kita
sv: Spraysträngens finish/effekt: Glitter; Blank; Självlysande; Holografisk; Matt; Metallic; Flerfärgad/blandad effekt; Neon; Pärlemor; UV-reaktiv (blacklight); Övrigt
vi: Hiệu ứng/lớp phủ dạng sợi phun: Kim tuyến; Bóng; Dạ quang; Hologram; Mờ; Ánh kim; Nhiều màu/hiệu ứng hỗn hợp; Neon; Ánh ngọc trai; Phản ứng tia UV (đèn huỳnh quang); Khác
ko: 스프레이 스트링 마감/효과: 글리터; 유광; 야광; 홀로그램; 무광; 메탈릭; 멀티컬러/혼합 효과; 네온; 진주광택; UV 반응(블랙라이트); 기타
zh-TW: 噴彩罐表面處理/效果: 亮片; 亮面; 夜光; 雷射全像; 霧面; 金屬色; 多色/混合效果; 螢光色; 珠光; 具紫外線活性 (黑光); 其他
da: Finish eller effekt for sprayserpentiner: Glimmer; Blank; Selvlysende; Holografisk; Mat; Metallisk; Flerfarvet/blandet effekt; Neon; Perlemor; UV-reaktiv (blacklight); Andet
it: Finitura/effetto della schiuma filante spray: Glitterato; Lucido; Fosforescente; Olografico; Opaco; Metallizzato; Multicolore/effetto misto; Fluo; Perlescente; Reattivo ai raggi UV (luce nera); Altro
en: Spray string finish/effect: Glitter; Gloss; Glow-in-the-dark; Holographic; Matte; Metallic; Multicolor/mixed effect; Neon; Pearlescent; UV-reactive (blacklight); Other
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava/efekt spreja: Trblietavý; Lesklý; Svietiaci v tme; Holografický; Matný; Metalický; Viacfarebný/zmiešaný efekt; Neónový; Perleťový; Reagujúci na UV svetlo; Iné
tr: Sprey ip görsel efekti: Simli; Parlak; Karanlıkta parlayan; Holografik; Mat; Metalik; Çok renkli/karma efekt; Neon; Sedefli; UV reaktif (siyah ışık); Diğer
ja: スプレーストリング仕上げ／効果: グリッター; 光沢; 蓄光; ホログラフィック; マット; メタリック; マルチカラー / ミックスエフェクト; ネオン; パール; UV反応 (ブラックライト); その他
el: Φινίρισμα/εφέ σπρέι σερπαντίνας: Γκλίτερ; Γυαλιστερό; Φωσφορίζει στο σκοτάδι; Ολογραφικό; Ματ; Μεταλλικό; Πολύχρωμο/μεικτό εφέ; Νέον; Περλέ; Αντιδρά στην υπεριώδη ακτινοβολία (blacklight); Άλλο
pt-BR: Serpentina em spray acabamento/efeito: Glitter; Brilhante; Brilha no escuro; Holográfico; Fosco; Metálico; Multicolorido/efeito misto; Neon; Perolado; Reativo à luz UV (luz negra); Outro
fr: Finition ou effet de la bombe à serpentins: Paillettes; Brillant; Phosphorescent; Holographique; Mat; Métallique; Multicolore/effet mixte; Fluo; Nacré; Réactif aux UV (lumière noire); Autre
ru: Отделка и эффект аэрозольной нити: Блестки; Глянец; Светится в темноте; Голография; Матовый; Металлик; Мультиколор/смешанный эффект; Неон; Перламутр; Реагирует на УФ-излучение; Другой
es: Acabado/efecto del aerosol de serpentinas: Purpurina; Brillo; Brilla en la oscuridad; Holográfico; Mate; Metálico; Multicolor/efecto mixto; Neón; Nacarado; Reactivo a los rayos UV (luz negra); Otro
zh-CN: 喷丝光泽/效果: 闪光; 亮泽; 夜光; 镭射全息; 哑光; 金属感; 多色/混合效果; 霓虹; 珠光; UV 反应（紫外光）; 其他
ro-RO: Finisaj/efect al sprayului cu spumă: Sclipici; Lucios; Fosforescent; Holografic; Mat; Metalizat; Efect multicolor/mixt; Neon; Perlat; Reactiv UV (lumină neagră); Altele
nb: Spraystyrkes finish/effekt: Glitter; Glans; Selvlysende; Holografisk; Matt; Metallisk; Flerfarget/blandet effekt; Neon; Perlemor; UV-reaktiv (blacklight); Annet
nl: Serpentinespray afwerking/effect: Glitter; Glans; Glow-in-the-dark; Holografisch; Mat; Metallic; Meerkleurig/gemengd effect; Neon; Parelmoer; UV-reactief (blacklight); Overige
cs: Povrch/efekt provázku ve spreji: Se třpytkami; Lesklý; Svítící ve tmě; Holografický; Matný; Metalický; Vícebarevný / smíšený efekt; Neonový; Perleťový; Reagující na UV záření (blacklight); Jiné
hr-HR: Završna obrada/efekt spreja: Šljokice; Sjaj; Svijetli u mraku; Holografski; Mat; Metalik; Višebojni/mješoviti učinak; Neon; Sedefasti; Reagira na UV zračenje (crno svjetlo); Ostalo
de: Effekt der Sprühschlangen: Glitzer; Glänzend; Im Dunkeln leuchtend; Holografisch; Matt; Metallic; Mehrfarbig/Mischeffekt; Neon; Perlglanz; UV-reaktiv (Schwarzlicht); Sonstige
pl: Wykończenie/efekt serpentyny w sprayu: Brokatowe; Z połyskiem; Świecące w ciemności; Holograficzne; Matowe; Metaliczne; Wielokolorowe/efekt mieszany; Neonowe; Perłowe; Reagujące na promieniowanie UV; Inne
fi: Serpentiinisprayn viimeistely/efekti: Glitter; Kiiltävä; Pimeässä hohtava; Holografinen; Matta; Metallinhohtoinen; Monivärinen/sekaväriefekti; Neon; Helmiäinen; UV-reaktiivinen (mustavalo); Muu